New Mexico, session 2026, SB300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the children, youth and families department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to improve computer hardware and software used in child welfare cases that are compatible with the national child welfare data management system used by the United States department of health and human services. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund.